Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2274.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) The state of Kansas is hereby designated as a
purple heart state in recognition of the many citizens of the state who
have earned the purple heart medal as a result of being wounded while
engaged in combat with an enemy force.
(b) Each year, the governor shall issue a proclamation recognizing
the purple heart day, to be observed on August 7 of each year, following
the tradition established by George Washington in 1782 and revived in
1932 that distinguishes the purple heart as a decoration of honor
awarded to members of the armed forces and United States citizens who
were honorably wounded in action. The award has been limited to
members of the military since 1997 by congressional action.
(c) The executive director of the office of veterans services shall
promote the observance of purple heart day with appropriate activities
and direct each local chapter of all veterans' organizations to plan
special activities and events to honor the purple heart recipients in each
chapter.
(d) All residents of this state are enjoined to devote some portion of
purple heart day to recognizing and commemorating the recipients of
the purple heart who have demonstrated a commitment to fighting for
the ideals that have made this nation great, have served this nation so
valiantly and are role models for all to emulate.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-1324 is hereby amended to read as

HB 2274—Am. by SC 2
follows: 8-1324. (a) Any resident who does not hold a current valid
Kansas driver's license may make application to the division of vehicles
and be issued one identification card.
(b) (1) Each application for an identification card shall include a
question asking if the applicant is willing to give such applicant's
authorization to be listed as an organ, eye and tissue donor in the
Kansas donor registry in accordance with the revised uniform
anatomical gift act, K.S.A. 65-3220 through 65-3244, and amendments
thereto. The gift would become effective upon the death of the donor.
(2) For the purpose of obtaining an identification card, an
applicant shall submit, with the application, proof of age, proof of
identity and proof of lawful presence. An applicant shall submit with the
application a photo identity document, except that a non-photo identity
document is acceptable if it includes both the applicant's full legal name
and date of birth, and, except as provided in subsection (k)(2),
documentation showing the applicant's name, the applicant's address of
principal residence and the applicant's social security account number.
The applicant's social security number shall remain confidential and
shall not be disclosed, except as provided pursuant to K.S.A. 74-2014,
and amendments thereto. If the applicant does not have a social security
number, the applicant shall provide proof of lawful presence and Kansas
residency. The division shall assign a distinguishing number to the
identification card. Before issuing an identification card to a person, the
division shall make reasonable efforts to verify with the issuing agency
the issuance, validity and completeness of each document required to be
presented by the applicant to prove age, identity and lawful presence.
(c) The division shall not issue an identification card to any person
who fails to provide proof that the person is lawfully present in the
United States. If an applicant provides evidence of lawful presence as set
out in K.S.A. 8-240(b)(2)(E) through (2)(I), and amendments thereto, or
is an alien lawfully admitted for temporary residence under K.S.A. 8-
240(b)(2)(B), and amendments thereto, the division may only issue a
temporary identification card to the person under the following
conditions:
(1) A temporary identification card issued pursuant to this
subparagraph subsection shall be valid only during the period of time of
the applicant's authorized stay in the United States or, if there is no
definite end to the period of authorized stay, a period of one year;
(2) a temporary identification card issued pursuant to this
subparagraph subsection shall clearly indicate that it is temporary and
shall state the date upon which it expires;
(3) no temporary identification card issued pursuant to this
subparagraph subsection shall be for a longer period of time than the

HB 2274—Am. by SC 3
time period permitted by K.S.A. 8-1325, and amendments thereto; and
(4) a temporary identification card issued pursuant to this
subparagraph subsection may be renewed, subject at the time of renewal,
to the same requirements and conditions set forth in this subsection for
the issuance of the original temporary identification card.
(d) The division shall not issue an identification card to any person
who holds a current valid Kansas driver's license unless such driver's
license has been physically surrendered pursuant to the provisions of
K.S.A. 8-1002(e), and amendments thereto.
(e) The division shall refuse to issue an identification card to a
person holding a driver's license or identification card issued by another
state without confirmation that the person is terminating or has
terminated the license or identification card.
(f) The parent or guardian of an applicant under 16 years of age
shall sign the application for an identification card submitted by such
applicant.
(g) (1) The division shall require payment of a fee of $14 at the time
application for an identification card is made, except that persons who
are 65 or more years of age or who are handicapped, as defined in
K.S.A. 8-1,124, and amendments thereto, shall be required to pay a fee
of only $10. In addition to the fees prescribed by this subsection, the
division shall require payment of the photo fee established pursuant to
K.S.A. 8-243, and amendments thereto, for the cost of the photograph to
be placed on the identification card.
(2) The division shall not require or accept payment of application
or photo fees under this subsection for any person 17 years of age or
older for purposes of meeting the voter identification requirements of
K.S.A. 25-2908, and amendments thereto. Such person shall:
(A) Swear under oath that such person desires an identification
card in order to vote in an election in Kansas and that such person does
not possess any of the forms of identification acceptable under K.S.A.
25-2908, and amendments thereto. The affidavit shall specifically list the
acceptable forms of identification under K.S.A. 25-2908, and
amendments thereto; and
(B) produce evidence that such person is registered to vote in
Kansas.
(3) The secretary of revenue shall adopt rules and regulations in
order to implement the provisions of paragraph (2).
(h) All Kansas identification cards shall have physical security
features designed to prevent tampering, counterfeiting or duplication for
fraudulent purposes.
(i) For the purposes of K.S.A. 8-1324 through 8-1328, and
amendments thereto, a person shall be deemed to be a resident of the

HB 2274—Am. by SC 4
state if the person:
(1) Owns, leases or rents a place of domicile in this state;
(2) engages in a trade, business or profession in this state;
(3) is registered to vote in this state;
(4) enrolls the person's child in a school in this state; or
(5) registers the person's motor vehicle in this state.
(j) The division shall require that any person applying for an
identification card submit to a mandatory facial image capture. The
captured facial image shall be displayed on the front of the applicant's
identification card by either:
(1) A digital color image or photograph; or
(2) a laser-engraved photograph of the licensee.
(k) (1) Any person who is a veteran may request that the division
issue to such person a nondriver identification card that shall include
the designation "VETERAN" displayed on the front of the nondriver
identification card at a location to be determined by the secretary of
revenue. In order to receive a nondriver identification card described in
this subsection, the veteran shall provide a copy of the veteran's DD
form 214, NGB form 22 or equivalent discharge document showing
character of service as honorable or general under honorable
conditions.
(2) (A) Any person who is a veteran and homeless may apply for and
be issued an identification card pursuant to this section without providing
an address of principal residence.
(B) In addition to any documents proving identity and residency in
Kansas accepted for an application for an identification card pursuant to
this section, a homeless veteran may provide to the division and the
division shall accept a letter or certificate from the Kansas office of
veterans services, the Kansas soldiers' home, the Kansas veterans' home,
any veterans services medical center located in Kansas, any jail or
correctional facility or any nonprofit organization located in Kansas for
the provision of services for the homeless verifying such applicant resides
at or receives services from such entity, and either:
(i) Copies or digital forms of accepted documents for proof of identity
in lieu of original documents; or
(ii) certain expired forms of identification, including, but not limited
to, common access cards, Kansas driver's licenses or Kansas voter
registration cards.
(3) As used in this subsection, "veteran" means a person who
served in the active military, naval, air or space service and who was
discharged or released therefrom under an honorable discharge or a
general discharge under honorable conditions.
(3)(4) The director of vehicles may adopt any rules and regulations

HB 2274—Am. by SC 5
necessary to carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(l) The director of vehicles may issue a temporary identification
card to an applicant who cannot provide valid documentary evidence as
defined by subsection (c), if the applicant provides compelling evidence
proving current lawful presence. Any temporary identification card
issued pursuant to this subparagraph shall be valid for one year.
(m) Upon payment of the required fee, the division shall issue to
every applicant qualifying under the provisions of this act an
identification card. Such identification card shall bear a distinguishing
number assigned to the cardholder, the full legal name, date of birth,
address of principal residence, except as provided in subsection (k)(2), a
brief description of the cardholder, either:
(1) A digital color image or photograph; or
(2) a laser-engraved photograph of the cardholder, and a facsimile
of the signature of the cardholder. An identification card that does not
contain the address of principal residence of the cardholder as required
may be issued to persons who are program participants pursuant to
K.S.A. 75-455, and amendments thereto, or persons who meet the
qualifications and apply for an identification card as described in
subsection (k)(2).
(n) An identification card issued to any person who indicated on
the application that the person wished to make an anatomical gift in
accordance with the revised uniform anatomical gift act, K.S.A. 65-3220
through 65-3244, and amendments thereto, shall have the word
"Donor" placed on the front of the applicant's identification card.
(o) (1) Any person who submits satisfactory proof to the director of
vehicles, on a form provided by the director, that such person needs
assistance with cognition, including, but not limited to, persons with
autism spectrum disorder, may request that the division issue to such
person a nondriver identification card, that shall note such impairment
on the nondriver identification card at a location to be determined by the
secretary of revenue.
(2) Satisfactory proof that a person needs assistance with cognition
shall include a statement from a person licensed to practice the healing
arts in any state, an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under
K.S.A. 65-1131, and amendments thereto, a licensed physician assistant
or a person clinically licensed by the Kansas behavioral sciences
regulatory board certifying that such person needs assistance with
cognition.
(p) The secretary of revenue shall permit an electronic online
renewal of an identification card if the electronic online renewal
applicant previously provided documentation of identity, lawful presence
and residence to the division for electronic scanning. For purposes of

HB 2274—Am. by SC 6
this subsection, the division may rely on the division's most recent,
existing color digital image and signature image of the applicant for the
nondriver's identification card if the division has such images on file.
The determination on whether an electronic online renewal application
or equivalent of a nondriver's identification card is permitted shall be
made by the director of vehicles or the director's designee. The division
shall not renew a nondriver's identification card through an electronic
online or equivalent process if the identification card has been
previously renewed through an electronic online application in the
immediately preceding card's expiration period. No renewal under this
subsection shall be granted to any person who is a registered offender
pursuant to K.S.A. 22-4901 et seq., and amendments thereto.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 8-1325 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-1325.
(a) Every identification card shall expire, unless earlier canceled or
subsection (c) of K.S.A. 8-1324(c), and amendments thereto, applies, on
the sixth birthday of the applicant following the date of original issue,
except as otherwise provided by K.S.A. 8-1329, and amendments thereto.
Renewal of any identification card shall be made for a term of six years
and shall expire in a like manner as the originally issued identification
card, unless surrendered earlier or subsection (c) of K.S.A. 8-1324(c),
and amendments thereto, applies. For any person who has been issued
an identification card, the division shall mail a notice of expiration or
renewal at least 30 days prior to the expiration of such person's
identification card at the address shown on such identification card. The
division shall include with such notice, written information required
under subsection (b). Any application for renewal received later than 90
days after expiration of the identification card shall be considered to be
an application for an original identification card. The division shall
require payment of a fee of $14 for each identification card renewal,
except that persons who are 65 or more years of age or who are persons
with a disability, as defined in K.S.A. 8-1,124, and amendments thereto,
shall be required to pay a fee of $10. Any identification card holder,
whose identification card has expired after March 12, 2020, and before
March 31, 2021, shall have until June 30, 2021, to renew such
identification card.
(b) The division shall reference the website of the agency in a
person's notice of expiration or renewal under subsection (a). The
division shall provide the following information on the website of the
agency:
(1) Information explaining the person's right to make an
anatomical gift in accordance with K.S.A. 8-1328, and amendments
thereto, and the revised uniform anatomical gift act, K.S.A. 65-3220
through 65-3244, and amendments thereto;

HB 2274—Am. by SC 7
(2) information describing the organ donation registry program
maintained by the Kansas federally designated organ procurement
organization. The information required under this paragraph shall
include, in a type, size and format that is conspicuous in relation to the
surrounding material, the address and telephone number of Kansas'
federally designated organ procurement organization, along with an
advisory to call such designated organ procurement organization with
questions about the organ donor registry program;
(3) information giving the applicant the opportunity to be placed on
the organ donation registry described in paragraph (2);
(4) inform the applicant that, if the applicant indicates under this
subsection a willingness to have such applicant's name placed on the
organ donor registry described in paragraph (2), the division will
forward the applicant's name, gender, date of birth and most recent
address to the organ donation registry maintained by the Kansas
federally designated organ procurement organization, as required by
paragraph (6);
(5) the division may fulfill the requirements of paragraph (4) by
one or more of the following methods:
(A) Providing such information on the website of the agency; or
(B) providing printed material to an applicant who personally
applies for an identification card; and
(6) if an applicant indicates a willingness under this subsection to
have such applicant's name placed on the organ donor registry
described, the division shall within 10 days forward the applicant's
name, gender, date of birth and address to the organ donor registry
maintained by the Kansas federally designated organ procurement
organization. The division may forward information under this
subsection by mail or by electronic means. The division shall not
maintain a record of the name or address of an individual who indicates
a willingness to have such person's name placed on the organ donor
registry after forwarding that information to the organ donor registry
under this subsection. Information about an applicant's indication of a
willingness to have such applicant's name placed on the organ donor
registry that is obtained by the division and forwarded under this
paragraph shall be confidential and not disclosed.
(c) Any identification card issued to a person who is a veteran and
homeless as provided in K.S.A. 8-1324, and amendments thereto, shall not
expire.
Section 1. Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 48-3406 is hereby amended to
read as follows: 48-3406. (a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Applicant" means an individual who is:
(A) A military spouse or military servicemember who resides or plans

HB 2274—Am. by SC 8
to reside in this state due to the assigned military station of the individual
or the individual's spouse; or
(B) an individual who has established or intends to establish
residency in this state.
(2) "Complete application" means the licensing body has received all
forms, fees, documentation, a signed affidavit stating that the application
information, including necessary prior employment history, is true and
accurate and any other information required or requested by the licensing
body for the purpose of evaluating the application, consistent with this
section and the rules and regulations adopted by the licensing body
pursuant to this section. If the licensing body has received all such forms,
fees, documentation and any other information required or requested by
the licensing body, an application shall be deemed to be a complete
application even if the licensing body has not yet received a criminal
background report from the Kansas bureau of investigation. An application
by a military spouse of an active a military servicemember shall be
considered a "complete application" without the submission of fees,
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (u).
(3) "Electronic credential" or "electronic certification, license or
registration" means an electronic method by which a person may display
or transmit to another person information that verifies the status of a
person's certification, licensure, registration or permit as authorized by a
licensing body and is equivalent to a paper-based certification, license,
registration or permit.
(4) "Licensing body" means an official, agency, board or other entity
of the state that authorizes individuals to practice a profession in this state
and issues a license, registration, certificate, permit or other authorization
to an individual so authorized.
(5) "Military servicemember" means a current member of any branch
of the United States armed services, United States military reserves or
national guard of any state or a former member with an honorable
discharge.
(6) "Military spouse" means the spouse of a military servicemember.
(7) "Person" means a natural person.
(8) "Private certification" means a voluntary program in which a
private organization grants nontransferable recognition to an individual
who meets personal qualifications and standards relevant to performing the
occupation as determined by the private organization.
(9) "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, processes and
work that a person may perform under a government issued license,
registration or certification.
(10) "Verification system" means an electronic method by which the
authenticity and validity of electronic credentials are verified.

HB 2274—Am. by SC 9
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any licensing body
shall, upon submission of a complete application, issue a paper-based and
verified electronic license, registration or certification to an applicant as
provided by this section, so that the applicant may lawfully practice the
person's occupation. Any licensing body may satisfy any requirement
under this section to provide a paper-based license, registration,
certification or permit in addition to an electronic license, registration,
certification or permit by issuing such electronic credential to the applicant
in a format that permits the applicant to print a paper copy of such
electronic credential. Such paper copy shall be considered a valid license,
registration, certification or permit for all purposes.
(c) An applicant who holds a valid current license, registration or
certification in another state, district or territory of the United States shall
receive a paper-based and verified electronic license, registration or
certification:
(1) If the applicant qualifies under the applicable Kansas licensure,
registration or certification by endorsement, reinstatement or reciprocity
statutes, then pursuant to applicable licensure, registration or certification
by endorsement, reinstatement or reciprocity statutes of the licensing body
of this state for the license, registration or certification within 15 days from
the date a complete application was submitted if the applicant is a military
servicemember or military spouse or within 45 days from the date a
complete application was submitted for all other applicants; or
(2) if the applicant does not qualify under the applicable licensure,
registration or certification by endorsement, reinstatement or reciprocity
statutes of the licensing body of this state, or if the Kansas professional
practice act does not have licensure, registration or certification by
endorsement, reinstatement or reciprocity statutes, then the applicant shall
receive a license, registration or certification as provided herein if, at the
time of application, the applicant:
(A) Holds a valid current license, registration or certification in
another state, district or territory of the United States with licensure,
registration or certification requirements that the licensing body
determines authorize a similar scope of practice as those established by the
licensing body of this state, or holds a certification issued by another state
for practicing the occupation but this state requires an occupational
license, and the licensing body of this state determines that the
certification requirements certify a similar scope of practice as the
licensing requirements established by the licensing body of this state;
(B) has worked for at least one year in the occupation for which the
license, certification or registration is sought;
(C) has not committed an act in any jurisdiction that would have
constituted grounds for the limitation, suspension or revocation of the

HB 2274—Am. by SC 10
license, certificate or registration, or that the applicant has never been
censured or had other disciplinary action taken or had an application for
licensure, registration or certification denied or refused to practice an
occupation for which the applicant seeks licensure, registration or
certification;
(D) has not been disciplined by a licensing, registering, certifying or
other credentialing entity in another jurisdiction and is not the subject of
an unresolved complaint, review procedure or disciplinary proceeding
conducted by a licensing, registering, certifying or other credentialing
entity in another jurisdiction nor has surrendered their membership on any
professional staff in any professional association or society or faculty for
another state or jurisdiction while under investigation or to avoid adverse
action for acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct that would constitute
grounds for disciplinary action in a Kansas practice act;
(E) does not have a disqualifying criminal record as determined by
the licensing body of this state under Kansas law;
(F) provides proof of solvency, financial standing, bonding or
insurance if required by the licensing body of this state, but only to the
same extent as required of any applicant with similar credentials or
experience;
(G) pays any fees required by the licensing body of this state; and
(H) submits with the application a signed affidavit stating that the
application information, including necessary prior employment history, is
true and accurate.
Upon receiving a complete application and the provisions of subsection
(c)(2) apply and have been met by the applicant, the licensing body shall
issue the license, registration or certification within 15 days from the date
a complete application was submitted by a military servicemember or
military spouse, or within 45 days from the date a complete application
was submitted by an applicant who is not a military servicemember or
military spouse, to the applicant on a probationary basis, but may revoke
the license, registration or certification at any time if the information
provided in the application is found to be false. The probationary period
shall not exceed six months. Upon completion of the probationary period,
the license, certification or registration shall become a non-probationary
license, certification or registration.
(d) Any applicant who has not been in the active practice of the
occupation during the two years preceding the application for which the
applicant seeks a license, registration or certification under subsection (c)
(2) may be required to complete such additional testing, training,
monitoring or continuing education as the Kansas licensing body may
deem necessary to establish the applicant's present ability to practice in a
manner that protects the health and safety of the public, as provided by

HB 2274—Am. by SC 11
subsection (j).
(e) Upon submission of a complete application, an applicant may
receive an occupational license, registration or certification based on the
applicant's work experience in another state, if the applicant:
(1) Worked in a state that does not use an occupational license,
registration, certification or private certification to regulate an occupation,
but this state uses an occupational license, registration or certification to
regulate the occupation;
(2) worked for at least three years in the occupation during the four
years immediately preceding the application; and
(3) satisfies the requirements of subsection (c)(2)(C) through (H).
(f) Upon submission of a complete application, an applicant may
receive an occupational license, registration or certification under
subsection (b) based on the applicant's holding of a private certification
and work experience in another state, if the applicant:
(1) Holds a private certification and worked in a state that does not
use an occupational license or government certification to regulate an
occupation, but this state uses an occupational license or government
certification to regulate the occupation;
(2) worked for at least two years in the occupation;
(3) holds a current and valid private certification in the occupation;
(4) is held in good standing by the organization that issued the private
certification; and
(5) satisfies the requirements of subsection (c)(2)(C) through (H).
(g) An applicant licensed, registered or certified under this section
shall be entitled to the same rights and subject to the same obligations as
are provided by the licensing body for Kansas residents, except that
revocation or suspension of an applicant's license, registration or
certificate in the applicant's state of residence or any jurisdiction in which
the applicant held a license, registration or certificate shall automatically
cause the same revocation or suspension of such applicant's license,
registration or certificate in Kansas. No hearing shall be granted to an
applicant where such applicant's license, registration or certificate is
subject to such automatic revocation or suspension, except for the purpose
of establishing the fact of revocation or suspension of the applicant's
license, registration or certificate by the applicant's state of residence or
jurisdiction in which the applicant held a license, registration or certificate.
(h) In the event the licensing body determines that the license,
registration or certificate currently held by an applicant under subsection
(c)(2) or the work experience or private credential held by an applicant
under subsections (e) or (f), who is a military spouse or military
servicemember does not authorize a similar scope of practice as the
license, registration or certification issued by the licensing body of this

HB 2274—Am. by SC 12
state, the licensing body shall issue a temporary permit for a limited period
of time to allow the applicant to lawfully practice the applicant's
occupation while completing any specific requirements that are required in
this state for licensure, registration or certification that were not required
in the state, district or territory of the United States in which the applicant
was licensed, registered, certified or otherwise credentialed, unless the
licensing body finds, based on specific grounds, that issuing a temporary
permit would jeopardize the health and safety of the public.
(i) In the event the licensing body determines that the license,
registration or certification currently held by an applicant under subsection
(c)(2) or the work experience or private credential held by an applicant
under subsections (e) or (f), who is not a military spouse or military
servicemember, does not authorize a similar scope of practice as the
license, registration or certification issued by the licensing body of this
state, the licensing body may issue a temporary permit for a limited period
of time to allow the applicant to lawfully practice the applicant's
occupation while completing any specific requirements that are required in
this state for licensure, registration or certification that was not required in
the state, district or territory of the United States in which the applicant
was licensed, registered, certified or otherwise credentialed, unless the
licensing body finds, based on specific grounds, that issuing a temporary
permit would jeopardize the health and safety of the public.
(j) Any testing, continuing education or training requirements
administered under subsection (d), (h) or (i) shall be limited to Kansas law
that regulates the occupation and that are materially different from or
additional to the law of another state, or shall be limited to any materially
different or additional body of knowledge or skill required for the
occupational license, registration or certification in Kansas.
(k) A licensing body may grant licensure, registration, certification or
a temporary permit to any person who meets the requirements under this
section but was separated from such military service under less than
honorable conditions or with a general discharge under honorable
conditions.
(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply in conflict with
or in a manner inconsistent with federal law or a multistate compact, or a
rule or regulation or a reciprocal or other applicable statutory provision
that would allow an applicant to receive a license. Nothing in this section
shall be construed as prohibiting a licensing body from denying any
application for licensure, registration or certification, or declining to grant
a temporary or probationary license, if the licensing body determines that
granting the application may jeopardize the health and safety of the public.
(m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to be in conflict with
any applicable Kansas statute defining the scope of practice of an

HB 2274—Am. by SC 13
occupation. The scope of practice as provided by Kansas law shall apply to
applicants under this section.
(n) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, during a state of
emergency declared by the legislature, a licensing body may grant a
temporary emergency license to practice any profession licensed, certified,
registered or regulated by the licensing body to an applicant whose
qualifications the licensing body determines to be sufficient to protect
health and safety of the public and may prohibit any unlicensed person
from practicing any profession licensed, certified, registered or regulated
by the licensing body.
(o) Not later than January 1, 2025, licensing bodies shall provide
paper-based and verified electronic credentials to persons regulated by the
licensing body. A licensing body may prescribe the format or requirements
of the electronic credential to be used by the licensing body. Any statutory
or regulatory requirement to display, post or produce a credential issued by
a licensing body may be satisfied by the proffer of an electronic credential
authorized by the licensing body. A licensing body may use a third-party
electronic credential system that is not maintained by the licensing body.
(p) On or before January 1, 2025, and subject to appropriations
therefore, the secretary of administration shall develop and implement a
uniform or singular license verification portal for the purpose of verifying
or reporting license statuses such as credentials issued, renewed, revoked
or suspended by licensing bodies or that have expired or otherwise
changed in status. The secretary of administration may utilize the services
or facilities of a third party for the central electronic record system. The
central electronic record system shall comply with the requirements
adopted by the information technology executive council pursuant to
K.S.A. 75-7203, and amendments thereto. Beginning January 1, 2025,
each licensing body shall be able to integrate with the uniform or singular
license verification portal in the manner and format required by the
secretary of administration indicating any issuance, renewal, revocation,
suspension, expiration or other change in status of an electronic credential
that has occurred. No charge for the establishment or maintenance of the
uniform or singular license verification portal shall be imposed on any
licensing body or any person with a license, registration, certification or
permit issued by a licensing body. The centralized electronic credential
data management systems shall include an instantaneous verification
system that is operated by the licensing body's respective secretary, or the
secretary's designee, or the secretary's third-party agent on behalf of the
licensing body for the purpose of instantly verifying the authenticity and
validity of electronic credentials issued by the licensing body. Centralized
electronic credential data management systems shall maintain an auditable
record of credentials issued by each licensing body.

HB 2274—Am. by SC 14
(q) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting or
preventing a licensing body from developing, operating, maintaining or
using a separate electronic credential system of the licensing body or of a
third party in addition to making the reports to the central electronic record
system required by subsection (p) or participating in a multistate compact
or a reciprocal licensure, registration or certification process as long as the
separate electronic credential system of the licensing body integrates with
the uniform or singular license verification portal.
(r) Each licensing body shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to
implement and carry out the provisions of this section.
(s) This section shall not apply to the practice of law or the regulation
of attorneys pursuant to K.S.A. 7-103, and amendments thereto, or to the
certification of law enforcement officers pursuant to the Kansas law
enforcement training act, K.S.A. 74-5601 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(t) The state board of healing arts and the state board of technical
professions, with respect to an applicant who is seeking a license to
practice professional engineering or engage in the practice of engineering,
as defined in K.S.A. 74-7003, and amendments thereto, may deny an
application for licensure, registration or certification, or decline to grant a
temporary or probationary license, if the board determines the applicant's
qualifications are not substantially equivalent to those established by the
board. Such boards shall not otherwise be exempt from the provisions of
this act.
(u) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
applicants who are military spouses of active military service members
shall be exempt from all fees assessed by any licensing body to obtain an
occupational credential in Kansas and renew such credential including
initial or renewal application, licensing, registration, certification,
endorsement, reciprocity or permit fees and any criminal background
report fees, whether assessed by the licensing body or another agency.
Licensing bodies shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the
provisions of this subsection.
(v) This section shall apply to all licensing bodies not excluded under
subsection (s), including, but not limited to:
(1) The abstracters' board of examiners;
(2) the board of accountancy;
(3) the board of adult care home administrators;
(4) the secretary for aging and disability services, with respect to
K.S.A. 65-5901 et seq. and 65-6503 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(5) the Kansas board of barbering;
(6) the behavioral sciences regulatory board;
(7) the Kansas state board of cosmetology;
(8) the Kansas dental board;

HB 2274—Am. by SC 15
(9) the state board of education;
(10) the Kansas board of examiners in fitting and dispensing of
hearing instruments;
(11) the board of examiners in optometry;
(12) the state board of healing arts, as provided by subsection (t);
(13) the secretary of health and environment, with respect to K.S.A.
82a-1201 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(14) the commissioner of insurance, with respect to K.S.A. 40-241
and 40-4901 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(15) the state board of mortuary arts;
(16) the board of nursing;
(17) the state board of pharmacy;
(18) the Kansas real estate commission;
(19) the real estate appraisal board;
(20) the state board of technical professions, as provided by
subsection (t); and
(21) the state board of veterinary examiners.
(w) All proceedings pursuant to this section shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of the Kansas administrative procedure act
and shall be reviewable in accordance with the Kansas judicial review act.
(x) Commencing on July 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, each
licensing body listed in subsection (u)(1) through (21) shall provide a
report for the period of July 1 through June 30 to the director of legislative
research by August 31 of each year, providing information requested by
the director of legislative research to fulfill the requirements of this
subsection. The director of legislative research shall develop the report
format, prepare an analysis of the reports and submit and present the
analysis to the office of the governor, the committee on commerce, labor
and economic development of the house of representatives, the committee
on commerce of the senate, the committee on appropriations of the house
of representatives and the committee on ways and means of the senate by
January 15 of the succeeding year. The director's report may provide any
analysis the director deems useful and shall provide the following items,
detailed by applicant type, including military servicemember, military
spouse and non-military individual:
(1) The number of applications received under the provisions of this
section;
(2) the number of applications granted under this section;
(3) the number of applications denied under this section;
(4) the average time between receipt of the application and
completion of the application;
(5) the average time between receipt of a complete application and
issuance of a license, certification or registration; and

HB 2274—Am. by SC 16
(6) identification of applications submitted under this section where
the issuance of credentials or another determination by the licensing body
was not made within the time limitations pursuant to this section and the
reasons for the failure to meet such time limitations.
All information shall be provided by the licensing body to the director
of legislative research in a manner that maintains the confidentiality of all
applicants and in aggregate form that does not permit identification of
individual applicants.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-2418 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 65-2418. (a) (1) The secretary shall fix and charge by rules and
regulations the fees to be paid for certified copies or abstracts of
certificates or for search of the files for birth, death, fetal death,
marriage or divorce records when no certified copy or abstract is made.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the secretary shall remit all
moneys received by or for the secretary from fees, charges or penalties,
under the uniform vital statistics act, and amendments thereto, to the
state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state
treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to the
credit of the civil registration and health statistics fee fund created by
K.S.A. 65-2418e, and amendments thereto.
(2) The secretary shall not charge any fee for a certified copy of a
certificate or abstract or for a search of the files or records if the
certificate, abstract or search is requested by a person who exhibits
correspondence from the United States department of veterans affairs or
the Kansas office of veterans services that indicates that the person is
applying for benefits from the United States department of veterans
affairs and that such person needs the requested information to obtain
such benefits, except that, for a second or subsequent certified copy of a
certificate, abstract or search of the files requested by the person, the
usual fee shall be charged. The secretary may provide by rules and
regulations for exemptions from such fees.
(3) The secretary shall not charge or accept any fee for a certified
copy of a certificate or abstract or for a search of the files or records if the
certificate, abstract or search is requested by a homeless veteran who
exhibits correspondence from the Kansas office of veterans services, the
Kansas soldiers' home, the Kansas veterans' home, any veterans services
medical center located in Kansas, any jail or correctional facility or any
nonprofit organization located in Kansas for the provision of services for
the homeless indicating that the person is applying for a nondriver
identification card pursuant to K.S.A. 8-1324, and amendments thereto,
and that such person needs the requested information to apply for such
identification card. The secretary may adopt rules and regulations for

HB 2274—Am. by SC 17
exemption from such fees. For purposes of this paragraph, "veteran"
means the same as defined in K.S.A. 8-1324, and amendments thereto.
(4) The secretary shall not charge or accept any fee for a certified
copy of a birth certificate if the certificate is requested by any person
who is 17 years of age or older for purposes of voting if the applicant
lacks the identification required by K.S.A. 25-2908(h), and amendments
thereto, or to meet the voter registration requirements of K.S.A. 25-2309,
and amendments thereto. For voter registration purposes, an applicant
for registration shall swear under oath: (1) That such person plans to
register to vote in Kansas; and (2) that such person does not possess any
of the documents that constitute evidence of United States citizenship
under K.S.A. 25-2309(l), and amendments thereto. The affidavit shall
specifically list the documents that constitute evidence of United States
citizenship under K.S.A. 25-2309(l), and amendments thereto. The
secretary shall adopt rules and regulations in order to implement the
provisions of this subsection.
(4)(5) Upon receipt of any such remittance of a fee for a certified
copy of a birth certificate or abstract, $3 of each such fee for the first
copy of a birth certificate or abstract and $1 of each such fee for each
additional copy of the same birth certificate or abstract requested at the
same time shall be remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of
each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount
in the state treasury to the credit of the permanent families account of
the family and children investment fund created by K.S.A. 38-1808, and
amendments thereto. The balance of the money received for a fee for a
certified copy of a birth certificate or abstract shall be remitted to the
state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state
treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to the
credit of the civil registration and health statistics fee fund created under
this act.
(5)(6) Upon receipt of any such remittance of a fee for a certified
copy of a death certificate or abstract, $4 of each such fee for the first
certified copy of a death certificate or abstract and $2 of each such fee
for each additional copy of the same death certificate or abstract
requested at the same time shall be remitted to the state treasurer in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall
deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the district
coroners fund created by K.S.A. 22a-245, and amendments thereto. The
balance of the money received for a fee for a certified copy of a death
certificate or abstract shall be remitted to the state treasurer in

HB 2274—Am. by SC 18
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall
deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the civil
registration and health statistics fee fund created by K.S.A. 65-2418e,
and amendments thereto.
(b) Subject to K.S.A. 65-2415, and amendments thereto, the
national office of vital statistics may be furnished copies or data it
requires for national statistics. The state shall be reimbursed for the cost
of furnishing the data. The data shall not be used for other than
statistical purposes by the national office of vital statistics unless so
authorized by the state registrar of vital statistics.
Sec. 2. 6. K.S.A. 8-1325 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-1324, 48-3406 is
and 65-2418 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. 7. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.